Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 37.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Use of money. The state owns all money and other property of the society in the name of the society and there may be no division of its assets among society members. Money received by the society must be used for holding its annual fair and for other exhibitions or expositions the society holds, for the improvement of the fairgrounds, for the payment of expenses, premiums, and purses, for the acquisition of real and personal property, for the use and benefit of the society, and for furnishing attractions and amusements the board of managers considers necessary for the success of its fairs and other exhibitions and expositions.new text begin The society must reimburse the cities of St. Paul and Falcon Heights for expenses the cities incur as a result of events held on the fairgrounds, including costs for public safety, police, fire, and emergency medical services; traffic management; sanitation; and neighborhood clean up and restoration.new text end